Maryland, session 2025, HB1352.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
15–140.
(A) AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION:
(1) SHALL PROVIDE REASONABLE ACCOMMODATIONS TO A STUDENT
WITH SICKLE CELL DISEASE; AND
(2) MAY NOT DENY ACCESS TO FACILITIES OR SERVICES TO A
STUDENT BASED ON THE STUDENT’S DIAGNOSIS OF SICKLE CELL DISEASE.
(B) AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION SHALL ESTABLISH A
PROCEDURE THROUGH WHICH A PERSON MAY REPORT AN ALLEGED VIOLATION OF
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION.
(C) AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION SHALL PUBLICIZE IN A
MANNER THAT IS CLEAR AND ACCESSIBLE TO STUDENTS:
(1) THE REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(2) THE REPORTING PROCEDURE ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBSECTION
(B) OF THIS SECTION.
Article – Health – General
18–510.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION WITH SICKLE CELL DISEASE
TREATMENT PROVIDERS AND COMMUNITY–BASED ORGANIZATIONS, SHALL
DEVELOP AN EDUCATION AND AWARENESS CAMPAIGN FOR INSTITUTIONS OF
HIGHER EDUCATION IN THE STATE REGARDING STUDENTS WITH SICKLE CELL
DISEASE.

HOUSE BILL 1352 3
(B) THE PROGRAM DEVELOPED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION
SHALL:
(1) DESCRIBE CHALLENGES FACED BY YOUNG ADULTS LIVING WITH
SICKLE CELL DISEASE, WITH AN EMPHASIS ON CHALLENGES FACED DURING HEALTH
CRISES RELATED TO SICKLE CELL DISEASE; AND
(2) PROVIDE INFORMATION ON ACCOMMODATIONS AND SUPPORT
THAT INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION CAN PROVIDE TO STUDENTS WITH
SICKLE CELL DISEASE TO ENABLE THE STUDENTS TO SUCCEED ACADEMICALLY
WHILE MANAGING SICKLE CELL DISEASE.
18–511.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE MARYLAND HIGHER
EDUCATION COMMISSION, SHALL DEVELOP UNIFORM PROCEDURES FOR
INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION IN THE STATE TO FOLLOW IN ASSESSING,
SUPPORTING, AND TREATING STUDENTS WITH SICKLE CELL DISEASE.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT AND THE MARYLAND HIGHER EDUCATION
COMMISSION JOINTLY SHALL:
(1) BEGINNING DECEMBER 1, 2025, PROVIDE TECHNICAL
ASSISTANCE TO INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION TO:
(I) IMPLEMENT THE PROCEDURES DEVELOPED UNDER THIS
SECTION; AND
(II) INSTRUCT PERSONNEL OF INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER
EDUCATION REGARDING THE PROCEDURES DEVELOPED UNDER THIS SECTION; AND
(2) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2025, DEVELOP A PROCESS TO
MONITOR THE IMPLEMENTATION OF THE PROCEDURES BY INSTITUTIONS OF
HIGHER EDUCATION.
18–512.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEVELOP OR COMPILE MATERIALS TO
PROVIDE HEALTH PERSONNEL, FACULTY, AND ADMINISTRATIVE STAFF EMPLOYED
AT AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION IN THE STATE WITH A COMPREHENSIVE
EDUCATION ON SICKLE CELL DISEASE.

HOUSE BILL 1352
(B) THE MATERIALS DEVELOPED OR COMPILED UNDER THIS SECTION
SHALL FOCUS ON ENHANCING UNDERSTANDING OF SICKLE CELL DISEASE,
REDUCING STIGMAS, AND FOSTERING A SUPPORTIVE LEARNING ENVIRONMENT FOR
STUDENTS WITH SICKLE CELL DISEASE.
(C) EACH INSTITUTE OF HIGHER EDUCATION IS ENCOURAGED TO CONDUCT
AWARENESS CAMPAIGNS AND EDUCATIONAL SESSIONS BASED ON THE MATERIALS
DEVELOPED OR COMPILED UNDER THIS SECTION AS FINANCIAL RESOURCES ALLOW.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.